Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB416.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 161.028 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Education Professional Standards Board is recognized to be a public body
corporate and politic and an agency and instrumentality of the Commonwealth, in
the performance of essential governmental functions. The Education Professional
Standards Board has the authority and responsibility to:
(a) Establish standards and requirements for obtaining and maintaining a teaching
certificate;
(b) 1. Set standards for, approve, and evaluate college, university, and school
district programs for the preparation of teachers and other professional
school personnel. The standards set for college or university programs
for the preparation of teachers and other professional school
personnel shall:
a. Not require achieving a minimum composite or component score
on any assessment, including but not limited to a summative
assessment, as a:
i. Condition of admission to a program;
ii. Barrier to enrollment, continuation, or progression within
a program; or
iii. Requirement for clinical placement, student-teaching, or
other field-based experience;
b. Require an applicant for an undergraduate initial certification
program to complete and submit:
i. At the time of initial application, verification that the
candidate has completed a formative basic skills assessment
selected by the Education Professional Standards Board
Page 1 of 12
BR130900.100 - 1309 - XXXX 1/29/2026 2:18 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1309
and required by the college or university; and
ii. After an applicant has been admitted but prior to the first
day of attendance, the results of the formative basic skills
assessment taken in accordance with subpart i. of this
subdivision, which shall be used by the college or university
solely as a formative diagnostic assessment to determine
areas where a candidate may require academic support,
remediation, or supplemental instruction; and
c. Require program policy, for a candidate that is required to
complete a formative basic skills assessment selected by the
Education Professional Standards Board pursuant to subdivision
b. of this subparagraph, that:
i. Ensures that a candidate completes assessment prior to
initial application;
ii. Ensures that a candidate for an undergraduate initial
certification program submits the results of the assessment
prior to the first day of attendance; and
iii. Provides academic supports for a candidate aligned with
the candidate's performance on the formative basic skills
assessment.
Nothing in this subparagraph shall be interpreted to prohibit the
board or an education preparation program provider from considering
assessment results, in combination with other relevant indicators, to
determine candidate readiness for in-program milestones after a
candidate has enrolled.
2. College or university programs may be approved by the board for a
college or university with regional institutional level accreditation or
Page 2 of 12
BR130900.100 - 1309 - XXXX 1/29/2026 2:18 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1309
national institutional level accreditation that is recognized by the United
States Department of Education and is eligible to receive federal funding
under 20 U.S.C. secs. 1061 to 1063. Program standards shall reflect
national standards and shall address, at a minimum, the following:
a.[1.] The alignment of programs with the state's core content for
assessment as defined in KRS 158.6457;
b.[2.] Research-based classroom practices, including effective classroom
management techniques;
c.[3.] Emphasis on subject matter competency of teacher education
students;
d.[4.] Methodologies to meet diverse educational needs of all students;
e.[5.] The consistency and quality of classroom and field experiences,
including early practicums and student teaching experiences;
f.[6.] The amount of college-wide or university-wide involvement and
support during the preparation as well as the induction of new
teachers;
g.[7.] The diversity of faculty;
h.[8.] The effectiveness of partnerships with local school districts; and
i.[9.] The performance of graduates on various measures as determined
by the board;
(c) Conduct an annual review of diversity in teacher preparation programs;
(d) Provide assistance to universities and colleges in addressing diversity, which
may include researching successful strategies and disseminating the
information, encouraging the development of nontraditional avenues of
recruitment and providing incentives, waiving administrative regulations
when needed, and other assistance as deemed necessary;
(e) Discontinue approval of programs that do not meet standards or whose
Page 3 of 12
BR130900.100 - 1309 - XXXX 1/29/2026 2:18 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1309
graduates do not perform according to criteria set by the board;
(f) Issue, renew, revoke, suspend, or refuse to issue or renew; impose
probationary or supervisory conditions upon; issue a written reprimand or
admonishment; or any combination of actions regarding any certificate;
(g) Develop specific guidelines to follow upon receipt of an allegation of sexual
misconduct by an employee certified by the Education Professional Standards
Board. The guidelines shall include investigation, inquiry, and hearing
procedures which ensure the process does not revictimize the alleged victim
or cause harm if an employee is falsely accused;
(h) Receive, along with investigators hired by the Education Professional
Standards Board, training on the dynamics of sexual misconduct of
professionals, including the nature of this abuse of authority, characteristics of
the offender, the impact on the victim, the possibility and the impact of false
accusations, investigative procedures in sex offense cases, and effective
intervention with victims and offenders;
(i) Recommend to the Kentucky Board of Education the essential data elements
relating to teacher preparation and certification, teacher supply and demand,
teacher attrition, teacher diversity, and employment trends to be included in a
state comprehensive data and information system and periodically report data
to the appropriate Interim Joint Committee on Education;
(j) Submit reports to the Governor and the Legislative Research Commission and
inform the public on the status of teaching in Kentucky;
(k) Devise a credentialing system that provides alternative routes to gaining
certification and greater flexibility in staffing local schools while maintaining
standards for teacher competence;
(l) Develop a professional code of ethics;
(m) Charge reasonable fees for the issuance, reissuance, and renewal of
Page 4 of 12
BR130900.100 - 1309 - XXXX 1/29/2026 2:18 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1309
certificates that are established by administrative regulation. The proceeds
shall be used to meet a portion of the costs of the issuance, reissuance, and
renewal of certificates, and the costs associated with disciplinary action
against a certificate holder under KRS 161.120;
(n) Waive a requirement that may be established in an administrative regulation
promulgated by the board. A request for a waiver shall be submitted to the
board, in writing, by an applicant for certification, a postsecondary institution,
or a superintendent of a local school district, with appropriate justification for
the waiver. The board may approve the request if the person or institution
seeking the waiver has demonstrated extraordinary circumstances justifying
the waiver. Any waiver granted under this subsection shall be subject to
revocation if the person or institution falsifies information or subsequently
fails to meet the intent of the waiver;
(o) Promote the development of one (1) or more innovative, nontraditional or
alternative administrator or teacher preparation programs through public or
private colleges or universities, private contractors, the Department of
Education, or the Kentucky Commonwealth Virtual University and waive
administrative regulations if needed in order to implement the program;
(p) Grant approval, if appropriate, of a university's request for an alternative
program that enrolls an administrator candidate in a postbaccalaureate
administrator preparation program concurrently with employment as an
assistant principal, principal, assistant superintendent, or superintendent in a
local school district. An administrator candidate in the alternative program
shall be granted a temporary provisional certificate and shall be a candidate in
the Kentucky Principal Internship Program, notwithstanding provisions of
KRS 161.030, or the Superintendent's Assessment process, notwithstanding
provisions of KRS 156.111, as appropriate. The temporary certificate shall be
Page 5 of 12
BR130900.100 - 1309 - XXXX 1/29/2026 2:18 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1309
valid for a maximum of two (2) years, and shall be contingent upon the
candidate's continued enrollment in the preparation program and compliance
with all requirements established by the board. A professional certificate shall
be issued upon the candidate's successful completion of the program,
internship requirements, and assessments as required by the board;
(q) Employ consultants as needed;
(r) Enter into contracts. Disbursements to professional educators who receive less
than one thousand dollars ($1,000) in compensation per fiscal year from the
board for serving on an assessment validation panel or as a test scorer or
proctor shall not be subject to KRS 45A.690 to 45A.725;
(s) Sponsor studies, conduct research, conduct conferences, and publish
information as appropriate; and
(t) Issue orders as necessary in any administrative action before the board.
(2) (a) The board shall be composed of seventeen (17) members. The secretary of the
Education and Labor Cabinet and the president of the Council on
Postsecondary Education, or their designees, shall serve as ex officio voting
members. The Governor shall make the following fifteen (15) appointments:
1. Nine (9) members who shall be teachers representative of elementary,
middle or junior high, secondary, special education, and secondary
vocational classrooms;
2. Two (2) members who shall be school administrators, one (1) of whom
shall be a school principal;
3. One (1) member representative of local boards of education; and
4. Three (3) members representative of postsecondary institutions, two (2)
of whom shall be deans of colleges of education at public universities
and one (1) of whom shall be the chief academic officer or head of an
educator preparation program of an independent not-for-profit college or
Page 6 of 12
BR130900.100 - 1309 - XXXX 1/29/2026 2:18 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1309
university.
(b) The members appointed by the Governor shall be confirmed by the Senate
under KRS 11.160. If the General Assembly is not in session at the time of the
appointment, persons appointed shall serve prior to confirmation, but the
Governor shall seek the consent of the Senate at the next regular session or at
an intervening extraordinary session if the matter is included in the call of the
General Assembly.
(c) Each appointed member shall serve a three (3) year term. A vacancy on the
board shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment within
sixty (60) days after it occurs. A member shall continue to serve until his or
her successor is named. Any member who, through change of employment
status or residence, or for other reasons, no longer meets the criteria for the
position to which he or she was appointed shall no longer be eligible to serve
in that position.
(d) Members of the board shall serve without compensation but shall be permitted
to attend board meetings and perform other board business without loss of
income or other benefits.
(e) A state agency or any political subdivision of the state, including a school
district, required to hire a substitute for a member of the board who is absent
from the member's place of employment while performing board business
shall be reimbursed by the board for the actual amount of any costs incurred.
(f) A chairman shall be elected by and from the membership. A member shall be
eligible to serve no more than three (3) one (1) year terms in succession as
chairman. Regular meetings shall be held at least semiannually on call of the
chairman.
(g) The commissioner of education shall serve as executive secretary to the board
and may designate staff to facilitate his or her duties.
Page 7 of 12
BR130900.100 - 1309 - XXXX 1/29/2026 2:18 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1309
(h) To carry out the functions relating to its duties and responsibilities, the board
is empowered to receive donations and grants of funds; to appoint consultants
as needed; and to sponsor studies, conduct conferences, and publish
information.
Section 2. KRS 161.030 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding the age of the pupil, the certification of all teachers and other
school personnel, in public schools only, is vested in the Education Professional
Standards Board. When so certified, teachers and other school personnel shall not
be required to have licensure, certification, or other forms of approval from any
other state agency for the performance of their respective assignments within the
system of public schools, except as provided for by law. All certificates authorized
under KRS 161.010 to 161.126 shall be issued in accordance with the
administrative regulations of the Education Professional Standards Board. After
July 15, 1994, all certificate applications and other data collection instruments of
the board shall include a request for voluntary information about the applicant's
ethnic background. This information shall be available to help local school districts
locate minority candidates. A person who holds a certificate prior to this
requirement may request that ethnic information be added to his or her file. Nothing
in this section shall preclude the right of an individual in a nonpublic school from
seeking voluntary certification by the Education Professional Standards Board.
(2) Certificates shall be issued upon written application and in accordance with statutes
and regulations in effect at the time of application to persons who have completed,
at colleges, universities, or local school district programs approved by the
Education Professional Standards Board for the preparation of teachers and other
school personnel, the curricula prescribed by the administrative regulations of the
Education Professional Standards Board.
(3) (a) 1. Certification of all new teachers and teachers seeking additional
Page 8 of 12
BR130900.100 - 1309 - XXXX 1/29/2026 2:18 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1309
certification shall require the successful completion of appropriate
assessments prior to certification. The assessments shall be selected by
the Education Professional Standards Board and shall measure
knowledge in the specific teaching field of the applicant, including
content of the field and teaching of that content. The Education
Professional Standards Board shall determine the minimum acceptable
level of achievement on each assessment. The assessments shall
measure those concepts, ideas, and facts which are being taught in
teacher education programs in Kentucky. Upon successful completion of
the assessments and the approved teacher preparation program, a
professional certificate valid for five (5) years shall be issued.
2. Beginning July 1, 2027, the academic content assessments required
for applicants in each certification selected by the Education
Professional Standards Board shall be limited to the academic content
area or areas in which an applicant is seeking certification. The
academic content assessments selected shall be narrowly tailored to
ensure academic achievement and competency of an applicant in the
academic content area the applicant is seeking certification.
(b) If an applicant for teacher certification has completed the approved teacher
preparation program and has taken but failed to successfully complete the
appropriate assessments selected by the Education Professional Standards
Board, a conditional certificate may be issued for a period not to exceed one
(1) year. The employing school district, in collaboration with the teacher
education institution, shall provide technical assistance and mentoring support
to the conditionally certified teacher. The teacher shall retake the assessments
during the validity period of the conditional certificate. The conditional
certificate shall not be reissued. Upon successful completion of the required
Page 9 of 12
BR130900.100 - 1309 - XXXX 1/29/2026 2:18 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1309
assessments, a professional certificate valid for five (5) years shall be issued.
The Education Professional Standards Board shall promulgate administrative
regulations to establish the standards and procedures for issuance of a
conditional certificate.
(c) If an out-of-state teacher with less than two (2) years' experience comes to
Kentucky after the deadline for taking the assessments, a temporary certificate
may be issued for a period up to six (6) months. The teacher shall take the
assessments during the period of the temporary certificate. If the teacher fails
the assessments, the temporary certificate shall be valid only for the current
semester. If the teacher passes the assessments, a professional certificate valid
for five (5) years shall be issued.
(4) A reasonable fee to be paid by the teacher and directly related to the actual cost of
the administration of the assessments shall be established by the Education
Professional Standards Board. Provisions shall be made for persons having less than
minimum levels of performance on any assessment to repeat that assessment, and
candidates shall be informed of their strengths and weaknesses in the specific
performance areas. The Education Professional Standards Board shall provide for
confidentiality of the individual assessment scores. Scores shall be available only to
the candidate and to the education officials who are responsible for determining
whether established certification standards have been met. Scores shall be used only
in the assessment for certification of new teachers and of out-of-state teachers with
less than two (2) years of teaching experience who are seeking initial certification
in Kentucky.
(5) If an applicant establishes eligibility for a five (5) year professional certificate under
the provisions of subsection (3)(a) of this section, the applicant shall also be eligible
for the issuance of a certificate for substitute teaching as provided by the
administrative regulations of the Education Professional Standards Board.
Page 10 of 12
BR130900.100 - 1309 - XXXX 1/29/2026 2:18 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1309
(6) (a) The Education Professional Standards Board shall issue a ten (10) year
emeritus certificate to an applicant who has:
1. Retired or will retire not more than one (1) year prior to the expiration
date of the certificate;
2. Met the requirements to receive an emeritus certificate as set forth in
administrative regulation promulgated by the Education Professional
Standards Board; and
3. Completed the required application unless the provisions of KRS
161.120 apply.
(b) The Education Professional Standards Board shall issue a one (1) time five (5)
year exception certificate to an individual:
1. Whose certificate has expired;
2. Whose rank upon expiration was Rank I or Rank II;
3. Who has met the requirements to receive an exception certificate as set
forth in administrative regulation promulgated by the Education
Professional Standards Board;
4. Who completed three (3) years of classroom instruction prior to the
certificate's expiration; and
5. Who has completed the required application unless the provisions of
KRS 161.120 apply.
(7) The Education Professional Standards Board shall approve the curricula of any
college or university, or of any department thereof, for the training of teachers, and
any nontraditional or alternative teacher preparation program offered in a public or
private postsecondary education institution, private contractor, or state agency, and
shall also approve the curricula of any local district alternative certification
program, when the curricula comply with the administrative regulations of the
Education Professional Standards Board for the issuance of certificates and when
Page 11 of 12
BR130900.100 - 1309 - XXXX 1/29/2026 2:18 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1309
the institution has met the terms and conditions provided in KRS 161.010 to
161.120. Any student who has completed any of these curricula, as approved by the
Education Professional Standards Board, and who has completed the prescribed
requirements for the issuance of certificates shall be granted a certificate
corresponding to the curricula completed.
(8) The issuance of any certificate, except emergency certificates issued pursuant to
KRS 161.100, by the Education Professional Standards Board shall not be
dependent upon an offer of employment. The certification process, except for
emergency certificates, is independent of any job prospects and certification shall
be awarded on the basis of completing a teacher preparation program or an
alternative certification pathway and passing required assessments.
Page 12 of 12
BR130900.100 - 1309 - XXXX 1/29/2026 2:18 PM Jacketed